Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-129
Semitrailer, defined.

Semitrailer means any trailer so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by the towing vehicle. Semitrailer does not include an auxiliary axle or a car toter or tow dolly.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 29;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 18.